Maine, session 132, LD7.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 478, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Exemption amount. Except as provided in subsection 1-C and except for
assessments for special benefits, the just value of $10,000 of the homestead of a permanent
resident of this State who has owned a homestead in this State for the preceding 12 months
is exempt from taxation. Notwithstanding this subsection, a permanent resident of this
State who loses ownership of a homestead in this State due to a tax lien foreclosure and
subsequently regains ownership of the homestead from the municipality that foreclosed on
the tax lien is deemed to have continuously owned the homestead and may not be
determined ineligible for the exemption provided in this section due to the ownership of
the homestead by the municipality. In determining the local assessed value of the
exemption, the assessor shall multiply the amount of the exemption by the ratio of current
just value upon which the assessment is based as furnished in the assessor's annual return
pursuant to section 383. If the title to the homestead is held by the applicant jointly or in
common with others, the exemption may not exceed $10,000 of the just value of the
homestead, but may be apportioned among the owners who reside on the property to the
extent of their respective interests. A municipality responsible for administering the
homestead exemption has no obligation to create separate accounts for each partial interest
in a homestead owned jointly or in common.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Exemption amount for residents 65 years of age or older. Notwithstanding
subsections 1 and 1-B, for property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, the
exemption amount for a homestead of a permanent resident of this State who is 65 years of
age or older and who has resided on the homestead for at least the preceding 10 years is the
just value of $75,000 of the homestead.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §685, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended to read:
E. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2023, 76% of the taxes lost by
reason of the exemptions under subsections 1 and, 1‑B and 1-C.